Tennessee, session 114, HB1682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-102(87)(A)(ii), is amended by
deleting the language "labor or service cost,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-102(87)(A), is amended by
deleting subdivision (v) and renumbering the subsequent subdivision accordingly.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-102(87)(B), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(v) Labor and service costs, including repair and installation labor charges, that
are separately stated on an invoice or similar billing document given to the purchaser;
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-205(c), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (4) and (6) and renumbering the remaining subdivisions accordingly.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-203, is amended by deleting
subsection (d).
SECTION 6. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026,
the public welfare requiring it.
HB1682
008774
- 1 -